Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,158.03
Mobile nail technology salon; application; review; denial; inspection.

Each application for a license to operate a mobile nail technology salon shall be reviewed by the department for compliance with the requirements of the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act. If an application is denied, the applicant shall be informed in writing of the grounds for denial, and such denial shall not prejudice future applications by the applicant. If an application is approved, the department shall issue the applicant a certificate of consideration to operate a mobile nail technology salon pending an operation inspection. The department shall conduct an operation inspection of each salon issued a certificate of consideration within six months after the issuance of such certificate. A salon which passes the inspection shall be issued a permanent license. A salon which fails the inspection shall submit within fifteen days evidence of corrective action taken to improve those aspects of operation found deficient. If evidence is not submitted within fifteen days or if after a second inspection the salon does not receive a satisfactory rating, it shall immediately relinquish its certificate of consideration and cease operation.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 60.